Louisiana, session 2026, HB842.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:53(B)(2)(b), 55(D), 59(F), 62, 108(A), 110(B)(3), 154(D)(1) and
(3), 192(B)(1)(a), 193(A), 196(B) and (C)(2)(a), 197, 401.1(H), 402(A)(1), 433(B)(1),
465(B) and (D), 469(A), 491(B), 493, 495(B), 501(C), 532(F), 532.1(C)(1) and (4),
551(B)(2)(introductory paragraph), 562(B)(2), 564(B)(5)(b), 565(B) and (C), 571(A)(8),
573(E), 574(A)(2) and (3), 602(E)(2)(d), 604(B)(2)(c), 621(B), 1254(C),
1259(B)(2)(introductory paragraph), 1300.2(C)(1), 1300.3(A)(1)(b), 1303(K) and (L),
1309(D)(2), (K), and (N)(5), 1309.3(B)(4)(b), 1313(C)(1) and (H)(3) and (5), 1313.1(C)(2)
and (I)(2), 1314(B)(2) and (C)(2)(a) and (3), 1315(A)(1) and (2)(introductory paragraph),
(B), and (D)(2), 1317, 1333(B) and (G)(1) and (7), 1367.2(F), 1367.11(A), 1371(A)(1) and
(2)(introductory paragraph), 1401(G), 1402(B)(1)(a), 1405, 1413, and 1922.2(B)(2) are
hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 18:106.2, 110(B)(1)(c), 192(C), 465(E)(3),
1310(A)(3), 1316(D), 1401(H), and 1922.2(B)(3) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§53. Removal from office; may not be own immediate successor
* * *
B.
* * *
(2)
* * *
(b) If the commissioner of elections raises allegations that the parish registrar
has engaged in any conduct set forth in Paragraphs (A)(1) through (7) of this Section,
the board shall schedule a hearing on the allegations brought by the commissioner
of elections within thirty days of the receipt of the accusations allegations. If the
Page 3 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
commissioner of elections serves as a regular member of the board, he shall not serve
for the purposes of such hearings, and the secretary of state shall designate a member
of the Registrars of Voters Association to serve in the commissioner's place and shall
notify the board in writing of any such designation as provided in R.S. 18:23.
* * *
§55. Compensation of registrar of voters; amount and manner of payment; reduction
during tenure prohibited; prohibited increase
* * *
D. The state portion of each salary shall be paid biweekly by the state
through the secretary of state, and the parish portion of each salary shall be paid
biweekly, semimonthly, or monthly by the parish governing authority on the warrant
of the respective registrars. The funds for the parish portion of the salary shall be
annually appropriated by the parish governing authority and the funds for the state
portion of the salary shall be annually appropriated to the secretary of state.
* * *
§59. Deputies, confidential assistants, and other permanent office employees;
temporary employees; appointment and compensation; prohibited increase
in compensation
* * *
F. The state portion of the salary of each chief deputy registrar of voters and
confidential assistant shall be paid biweekly by the state through the secretary of
state, and the parish portion of the salary shall be paid biweekly, semimonthly, or
monthly by the parish governing authority on the warrant of each chief deputy and
confidential assistant. The funds for the parish portion of the salary shall be annually
appropriated by the parish governing authority and the funds for the state portion of
the salary shall be annually appropriated by the legislature to the secretary of state.
* * *
§62. Political activities prohibited
A. No registrar of voters, and or deputy registrar, or other employee of a
registrar who is in the unclassified state civil service shall participate or engage in:
Page 4 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
political activity, including his own or any other candidacy for election to public
office; membership on any national, state, or local committee of a political party or
faction; making or soliciting contributions for any political party, faction, or
candidate; or taking active part in the management of the affairs of a political party,
faction, candidate, or any political campaign, except to exercise his right as a citizen
to express his opinion privately and to cast his vote as he desires. As used in this
Section, the term "political activity" shall have the meaning ascribed to it in Article
X, Section 9(C) of the Constitution of Louisiana.
B. All deputy registrars and other employees of a registrar who are in the
classified state civil service shall be subject to the constitution and laws, and the
regulations adopted pursuant thereto, affecting political activities by persons in the
classified state civil service.
* * *
§106.2. Voter incapable of signing his name or making a mark
A. If a registered voter, subsequent to his registration, is no longer capable
of signing his name or making a mark due to a physical disability, he shall file with
the registrar of voters an alternative signature attestation to authorize another person
to sign documents required by this Title on his behalf, along with a letter signed by
a physician stating that the voter is unable to provide his signature or mark due to a
physical disability and that the voter is capable of providing consent for another
person to sign on his behalf.
B. The individual assisting a voter who filed the attestation provided for in
Subsection A of this Section shall complete and sign a form, at the voter’s direction
and in the presence of the voter and at least one witness, indicating that the voter is
unable to sign his name or make a mark due to a physical disability, that the voter
has verbally or otherwise attested that the individual was given the authority to sign
on the voter’s behalf, and that all information supplied on the form is true and correct
under penalty of perjury. The form shall also contain the individual’s printed name,
signature, and residential address, as well as the printed name and signature of the
witness.
Page 5 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
C. The individual authorized to assist the voter shall be an elector of the state
and shall not be a candidate, the voter’s employer or employer’s agent, or the voter’s
union agent.
D. When signing a document required by this Title on the voter’s behalf, the
individual authorized to assist the voter shall also sign and print his own name and
residential address on the document.
E. If a registered voter who is no longer capable of signing his name or
making a mark due to a physical disability appears in person to vote on election day
or during early voting, he shall verbally or otherwise convey his consent for the
commissioner or deputy registrar to sign the precinct register, early voting register,
and any other forms required by this Title, and the commissioner or deputy registrar
shall sign on behalf of the voter in the presence of at least one witness.
* * *
§108. Prior registration; surrender of notice of registration before new registration;
change of place of registration
A. If the registrant's application indicates that the applicant previously
registered as a voter in any other parish, and if the previous notice of registration is
available, then before making a new registration the registrar shall require the
applicant to surrender his previous notice for cancellation. The the registrar shall
promptly notify the registrar of the parish in which the applicant has registered
previously, through the statewide voter registration system, of the present
registration. The other registrar shall verify the cancellation of cancel the voter's
previous registration in the other parish; however, the cancellation shall not be made
as long as the registrant has the right to vote in the parish of his former residence as
provided in R.S. 18:110(C).
* * *
§110. Removal from precinct; removal from parish
* * *
B.(1) A change of registration based upon a change of residence within a
parish received after the closing of registration for a primary election shall become
Page 6 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
effective the day after the general election or special general election when a special
primary election is held in conjunction with a general election except as follows:
* * *
(c) A change of registration based upon a change of residence within a parish
received after the closing of registration for a closed party primary election shall
become effective the day after the second party primary election.
* * *
(3) However, in a regularly scheduled general election where the only
candidate's election appearing on any ballot in the parish is a special primary
election, then in such instance, the a change made prior to the close of registration
for the general election shall become effective prior to the special primary election.
In a regularly scheduled or special general election, where the change of registration
was made prior to the close of registration for the general election and does not
change any issues or candidate offices upon which the voter was entitled to vote
prior to the change, the change shall become effective prior to the regularly
scheduled or special general election.
* * *
§154. Records open to inspection; copying; exceptions
* * *
D.(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section, the registrar, the clerk
of court, and the Department of State shall not disclose the name and address of a
law enforcement officer if the registrar has received certification from the law
enforcement agency employing the officer that the officer is engaging in hazardous
activities to the extent that it is making it necessary for his name and address to be
kept confidential. The registrar shall indicate such certification in the state voter
registration computer system upon receipt of the certification.
* * *
(3)(a) Any agency employing a law enforcement officer availing himself of
Paragraph (1) of this Subsection shall also issue a decertification notice to the
registrar of voters when the officer is no longer engaging in hazardous activities to
Page 7 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
the extent that it is making it necessary for his name and address to be kept
confidential.
(b) Any time after certification by the employing agency, the law
enforcement officer may submit written notice to the registrar of voters that it is no
longer necessary for his name and address to be kept confidential.
(c) Upon receipt of a notice provided for in this Paragraph, the registrar shall
remove the indication of certification for the affected law enforcement officer from
the state voter registration computer system.
* * *
§192. Annual canvass; costs
* * *
B.(1) No later than June thirtieth, the Department of State shall conduct an
annual canvass as provided in this Subsection. Using information available in the
state voter registration computer system, the secretary of state shall identify
registrants who meet all of the following criteria:
(a) The registrant's name did not appear with a corrected address provided
by the United States Postal Service or its licensee pursuant to Subsection A of this
Section.
* * *
C. The Department of State is not required to conduct a canvass as provided
for in Subsection A or B of this Section in a calendar year when there is less than
sixty days between a regularly scheduled or special election date and the opening of
qualifying for a regularly scheduled or special primary election.
§193. Challenge and cancellation of registration; notice; procedures
A. When the registrar has reason to believe that a registrant no longer is
qualified to be registered, or that a registrant has changed his residence, the registrar
shall immediately notify the person by sending the address confirmation notice to the
registrant and place the voter on the inactive list of voters. However, a person shall
not be placed on the inactive list of voters if there is address information available
Page 8 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
to the registrar from the United States Postal Service or its licensee which indicates
the voter has moved to another address within the parish.
* * *
§196. Inactive list of voters; procedure for voting
* * *
B. A registrant whose name is on the inactive list of voters may vote:
(1) If the registrant has not changed residence, at the polling place of the
registrant's last address upon affirming in writing by completing an address
confirmation notice form affirming that the registrant still resides at the address on
file at the office of the registrar of voters.
(2) If the registrant has moved to an address within the parish in the same
precinct, at the polling place of the registrant's last address on file at the office of the
registrar of voters upon affirming in writing that the registrant resides in the precinct
by completing an address confirmation notice form affirming the new address within
the precinct.
(3) If the registrant has moved to an address within the parish in a different
precinct, at the polling place of the registrant's last address on file at the office of the
registrar of voters for that election only upon affirming in writing that the registrant
still resides in the parish by completing an address confirmation notice form
affirming the new address within the parish.
(4) If the registrant has moved to an address outside of the parish, at the
polling place of the registrant's last address on file at the office of the registrar of
voters for that election only upon affirming in writing that the registrant has moved
within the last three months and no longer resides in the parish by completing an
address confirmation notice form affirming the new address outside of the parish and
that the length of time since the move has not exceeded three months. If the
registrant does not affirm that he has moved within the last three months, the
registrant shall not be permitted to vote.
C.
* * *
Page 9 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
(2)(a) If a registrant whose name is on the inactive list of voters applies to
vote absentee by mail or votes absentee by mail or during early voting, the registrar
shall transfer the registrant's name to the official list of voters and make any
necessary corrections in the registrant's registration records if the information on the
address confirmation notice form, as required by R.S. 18:1309, or the residence
address provided in an application to vote by mail so indicates. The registrar shall
change the registrant's registration address to the residence address provided on the
address confirmation form or application to vote by mail.
* * *
§197. Registration; cancellation
No registrar of voters shall cancel the registration of any voter in his parish
between any open primary election and the subsequent general election occurring in
that parish as a result of any of the processes authorized by this Part, except in the
case of a person whose registration is cancelled pursuant to R.S. 18:193(G) or who
has been fraudulently placed upon the registration records or in the case of a person
whose registration is canceled pursuant to the annual canvass conducted by the
registrar.
* * *
§401.1. Election emergency; purpose; elections emergency contingency plan
* * *
H. For purposes of this Section, a vacancy in a party primary office that may
not be filled by appointment, designation, or in accordance with the timeframes
required by law shall constitute an emergency. If the vacancy may not be filled in
a timely manner in accordance with the election dates provided for in R.S. 18:402,
the governor may proclaim a state of emergency for purposes of calling a special
election to fill the vacancy. Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 18:401.3,
following the issuance of the emergency proclamation, the authority required by law
to call a special election to fill the vacancy in office shall, in consultation with and
with the certification of the secretary of state, issue a proclamation ordering a special
election. The proclamation ordering the special election shall include the dates for
Page 10 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
qualifying, early voting, the at least one party primary election, and the general
election, and at least one party primary election and make all provisions necessary
to conduct an election in a timely manner notwithstanding the dates, timing, and
delays otherwise provided by this Code.
* * *
§402. Dates of primary and general elections; prohibited election days
A. Prohibited election days. (1) No election of any kind shall be held in this
state on any of the days of Rosh Hashanah, Yom Kippur, Sukkot, Shemini Atzeret,
Simchat Torah, the first two days and the last two days of Passover, Shavuot, Tish'a
B'Av, the two days preceding Labor Day, the three days preceding Easter, or the
three days following Thanksgiving Day. If the date of any fall election falls on any
of the above-named days, the election shall be held on the same weekday day of the
preceding week. If the date of any spring election falls on any of the above-named
days, the election shall be held on the same day of the following week.
* * *
§433. Commissioners-in-charge; course of instruction; selection; commission;
disqualification; replacement
* * *
B. Selection. (1)(a) The parish board of election supervisors shall meet at
10:00 a.m. by on or before the second Friday in January of each year to select a
commissioner-in-charge to serve at each precinct in the parish. The meeting shall
be open to the public. The board shall have previously posted a notice on the front
door of the courthouse stating the location within the courthouse where the meeting
is to be held. The selection of commissioners-in-charge shall be made from the
certified list furnished by the clerk as required by Paragraph (A)(5) of this Section
and in the manner provided for in this Subsection.
Page 11 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
(b) If the course of instruction for commissioners-in-charge is delayed due
to a gubernatorially declared state of emergency as provided by Paragraph (A)(1) of
this Section, the parish board of election supervisors shall meet at 10:00 a.m. on or
before the fifth day after completion of the course of instruction.
* * *
§465. Nominating petitions
* * *
B. Method of nominating candidates. A person may only be nominated as
a candidate in a primary election only by persons who are registered to vote on the
office he seeks who sign a nominating petition for him no more than one hundred
twenty days before the qualifying period opens for candidates in the primary
election. In addition to his signature, each voter who signs a nominating petition
shall provide the information required by R.S. 18:3 date his signature and shall
provide the ward and precinct in which he is registered to vote, his residence address,
including the municipal number, the apartment number, if any, the rural route and
box number, or any other physical description that will identify his actual place of
residence. Once a voter has signed a nominating petition, he may not withdraw the
nomination. The secretary of state shall prepare forms which may be used by any
person who seeks nomination as a candidate by nominating petition. The secretary
of state shall furnish copies of the forms to each clerk of court, and the forms shall
be available, upon request, at the office of the secretary of state or at the office of the
clerk of court. Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to require nominating
petitions to be filed only on forms prepared by the secretary of state.
* * *
D. Form. In addition to the requirements of R.S. 18:3, each Each sheet of
the nominating petition shall set forth the candidate's name, the address of his
domicile, the office for which the signers nominate him, the political party with
which he is affiliated, if any, and the date of the primary election for which he seeks
to qualify. The name of each voter who signed the nominating petition shall be
typed or legibly written on the petition, and each signature on the nominating petition
Page 12 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
shall be dated and witnessed by the candidate or the person who obtained the
signature on his behalf. The candidate and all persons who obtained signatures on
his behalf shall certify on the nominating petition that to the best of their knowledge,
information, and belief all of the signatures on the nominating petition are genuine
and all of the statements contained in the nominating petition are true and correct.
E. Certification.
* * *
(3) The registrar of voters for each parish may request and accept the
assistance of employees of the Department of State and registrars and deputy
registrars of voters from other parishes to complete the certification of the
nominating petition.
* * *
§469. Reopening of qualifying period; effect
A. When a person who qualified as a candidate and has opposition in a
primary election for a public office dies after the close of the qualifying period and
before the time for closing the polls on the day of the primary election, the qualifying
period for candidates in the primary election for that office shall reopen for
candidates on the day after the secretary of state receives actual notice of the death
and shall close at 4:30 p.m. on the third day after notice of the death or, if that day
is a legal holiday, at 4:30 p.m. on the next day which is not a legal holiday. The
name of the deceased candidate shall not be printed on the primary election ballot.
If the primary election ballot was printed with the deceased candidate's name on it,
any votes received by the deceased candidate shall be void and shall not be counted
for any purpose whatsoever.
* * *
§491. Standing to object to candidacy
* * *
B. A registered voter may present evidence that a candidate has illegally
qualified for elective office. The evidence may be presented to the respective parish
district attorney, who may determine whether or not the evidence presented
Page 13 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
establishes grounds for objecting to such candidacy and if the district attorney makes
such a determination he may file an action objecting to candidacy within the time
limitation provided in R.S. 18:493 18:1405(A).
* * *
§493. Time for objecting to candidacy Subpoena and testimony; Department of
Revenue
A. An action objecting to candidacy shall be commenced in a court of
competent jurisdiction within seven days after the close of qualifications for
candidates in the primary election. However, if the time interval ends on a Saturday,
Sunday, or other legal holiday, then noon of the next day which is not a Saturday,
Sunday, or legal holiday shall be deemed to be the end of the time interval. After the
expiration of the time period set forth in this Section, no action shall be commenced
objecting to candidacy based on the grounds for objections to candidacy contained
in R.S. 18:492.
B.(1) Neither the secretary of the Department of Revenue nor any employee
engaged in the administration or charged with the custody of any records or files of
the Department of Revenue shall be subject to subpoena or otherwise required to
appear in court for any matter filed pursuant to this Section.
(2) B. In lieu of live testimony, a properly executed affidavit issued by the
secretary of the Department of Revenue or his designee shall serve as sufficient
confirmation as to the accuracy of the records and files of the secretary of the
Department of Revenue for such purposes.
* * *
§495. Initiation of action by district attorney; attorney general; court costs and
attorney fees
* * *
B. The district attorney shall have standing to bring such an action pursuant
to this Subpart. In addition, if requested in accordance with Subsection A of this
Section, the attorney general shall have standing to bring such an action pursuant to
this Subpart. The time limitation to commence an action objecting to candidacy
Page 14 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
prescribed by R.S. 18:493 18:1405(A) shall apply to such actions brought by the
district attorney or the attorney general.
* * *
§501. Procedure for withdrawal
* * *
C. Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsections A and B of this Section,
if the number of candidates remaining in a primary election, second party primary
election, or general election for a public office is one more than the number of
persons to be elected to the office, the secretary of state shall accept a notice of
withdrawal that is filed prior to 4:30 p.m. on the second business day prior to the first
day of early voting. The candidate or candidates remaining after the withdrawal
shall be declared elected by the people.
* * *
§532. Establishment of precincts
* * *
F. Prior to the adoption of an ordinance to establish the boundaries of
precincts pursuant to this Section, the parish governing authority shall submit the
proposed precincts and boundaries to the clerk of court and registrar of voters for
their review to confirm in writing the ability to conduct an election utilizing the
proposed boundaries. The parish governing authority shall submit to the secretary
of state in accordance with timetables in this Section, the written confirmation
received by the parish governing authority.
§532.1. Changing boundaries
* * *
C.(1) The parish governing authority shall comply with the provisions of
R.S. 18:532(A), (B), (C), and (E), and (F) when changing any precinct boundary.
* * *
(4) In addition to the requirements of Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, when
the proposed precinct change involves dividing a precinct, prior to the adoption of
the ordinance, the parish governing authority shall submit proposed changes to the
Page 15 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
clerk of court and registrar of voters to confirm in writing the ability to conduct an
election utilizing the proposed boundaries. The parish governing authority shall
submit to the secretary of state in accordance with timetables in this Section, the
written confirmation received by the parish governing authority.
* * *
§551. Ballots
* * *
B. Titles of offices.
* * *
(2) Below any party primary offices, the Except as provided in Paragraph (1)
of this Subsection, titles of the offices to be voted on in a primary or general election
shall be listed on the ballot in the following order:
* * *
§562. Prerequisites to voting
* * *
B. Review of precinct register. The commissioners shall then determine:
* * *
(2) If the applicant's name is found in the precinct register on the inactive list
of voters and the applicant has not voted absentee by mail or during early voting, the
applicant may vote after complying with provisions of R.S. 18:196(B). After such
compliance, one of the commissioners shall announce the applicant's name again and
shall preserve the address confirmation notice form received from the voter by
placing the address confirmation notice form in the envelope marked "Registrar of
Voters" and attaching the envelope to the precinct register.
* * *
§564. Assistance in voting on election day
* * *
Page 16 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
B. Persons prohibited from assisting voters.
* * *
(5)
* * *
(b) The voter, along with the person assisting the voter, shall complete a
voter assistance form and provide the name, address, and relationship to the voter of
the person, including a commissioner, assisting the voter and attest whether the
person, other than a commissioner, assisting the voter was paid to provide assistance.
If the voter is not marked for assistance in voting in the precinct register, the voter
shall attest on the voter assistance form that the voter has a physical disability or is
unable to read and requires assistance in voting.
* * *
§565. Challenge of voters
* * *
B. Disposition of record of challenge and address confirmation notice form.
The original record of the challenge, signed by the challenger, and the address
confirmation notice form shall be placed in the envelope marked "Registrar of
Voters". A duplicate record of the challenge shall be placed in the clear plastic
zipper bag and returned to the clerk of court on election night. A duplicate record of
the challenge shall be given to the voter being challenged.
C. Disposition of the challenge. The commissioners present shall determine
the validity of the challenge. If they determine by majority vote that the challenge
is valid, the applicant shall not be permitted to vote. However, if the valid challenge
has determined that the applicant has moved within the parish or has moved outside
of the parish within the last three months, the voter shall be allowed to vote upon
completing an address confirmation notice form. If a majority of the commissioners
determine that the challenge is invalid, the applicant shall be permitted to vote.
* * *
Page 17 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
§571. Procedures for commissioners after termination of voting
A. At the termination of voting in a primary or general election, the
commissioners shall announce that voting is terminated. The commissioners in the
presence of the watchers shall immediately:
* * *
(8) Place one copy of the official election results reports, one copy of the
machine certificates, one of the duplicate poll lists, all original executed challenges
of voters, all precinct register corrections, all voter identification affidavits, all voter
assistance forms, any physicians' certificates, any copies of disability documentation,
a copy of each completed notation of irregularities form, and any address
confirmation notices forms in the envelope marked "Registrar of Voters", seal it and
attach it to the precinct register after the termination of voting, and place a new
protective seal on the precinct register.
* * *
§573. Evidence of election results
* * *
E. Transmission and disposition of original challenges, duplicate voters'
affidavits, and address confirmation notices forms. (1) At the opening of the voting
machines, the sealed precinct registers shall be immediately returned to the registrar
of voters. Upon receipt of the sealed precinct registers, the registrar shall remove
any attached original record of challenges of voters made during the election, any
precinct register correction affidavits, any voter identification affidavits made
pursuant to R.S. 18:562, any address confirmation notices forms, any voter
assistance forms, any certificates, any copies of disability documentation, and any
completed voter registration applications.
(2) The registrar shall utilize the procedures set forth in Part V of Chapter
4 of this Code to determine the validity of the registration of each challenged voter
who did not submit an address confirmation notice form. In any instance where an
address confirmation notice form was received that stated an address different from
the address on file in the registrar's office for a registrant, the registrar shall change
Page 18 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
the registrant’s address to the address on the address confirmation notice form if the
change of address is in the parish; transfer the registrant’s registration to another
parish if the address on the address confirmation notice form is in another parish; or
cancel the registration if the address on the address confirmation notice form is in
another state. If an address confirmation notice form was received that affirmed the
address on file in the registrar's office, the registrar shall reinstate the registrant to
the official list of voters if the registrant appears on the inactive list of voters. If the
address confirmation notice form was a result of a valid challenge, the registrar shall
so inform the district attorney and shall transmit to him the address confirmation
notice form of that person.
(3) The registrar also shall proceed to determine if each voter submitting a
voter identification affidavit made pursuant to R.S. 18:562 attesting that he is a
qualified registered voter is in fact a registered voter qualified to vote in the election
by comparing the information provided by the voter with the information on file in
the registrar's office and by reasonably comparing the signature on the affidavit with
any signature on file for the voter in the registrar's office. If the registrar determines
that any person who has voted in the election by virtue of his submission of such an
affidavit was not a registered voter qualified to vote in the election, the registrar shall
so inform the elections compliance unit and shall transmit to it the affidavit of that
person.
(4) The registrar shall scan the address confirmation notice form, voter
identification affidavit, voter assistance form, or voter registration application and
add it to the voter's record in the state voter registration computer system after
processing.
§574. Compilation and promulgation of returns
A.
* * *
(2) Immediately after the completion of the verification by the clerk of court
and the counting and tabulation of provisional ballots for federal office, if applicable,
the board shall publicly prepare two a compiled statements statement of the election
Page 19 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
returns as shown by the record of the votes made by the clerk of court. The compiled
statements statement shall separately show the machine votes for each candidate and
for and against each proposition in each precinct, the total absentee by mail and early
voting votes for each candidate and for and against each proposition in the parish,
the total provisional votes for each candidate for federal office, and the total of all
votes for each candidate and for and against each proposition in the parish.
(3) The board shall complete the compilation of the election returns and file
one copy of the compiled statement with the clerk of court no later than 4:00 p.m. on
the fifth day after the election. One copy of the compiled statement shall be
postmarked The clerk of court shall transmit an electronic copy of the compiled
statement to the secretary of state no later than noon on the sixth day after the
election and mailed to the secretary of state. The clerk of court shall transmit the
election returns as shown by the compiled statement from the parish board of
election supervisors to the secretary of state no later than noon on the sixth day after
the election. In a parish containing a municipality with a population of three hundred
thousand or more, the parish board of election supervisors shall transmit the election
returns as shown by their compiled statement to the secretary of state no later than
noon on the sixth day after the election. Failure to comply with these time limits
shall not void the election.
* * *
§602. Vacancies in certain local and municipal offices; exceptions
* * *
E.
* * *
(2)
* * *
Page 20 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
(d) Within twenty-four hours Immediately after he receives the copy, the
secretary of state shall notify all election officials having any duty to perform in
connection with a special election to fill such vacancy, including the parish boards
of election supervisors for the parish or parishes in which the vacancy occurred.
* * *
§604. Marshal of city or municipal court; temporary absence; vacancy
* * *
B.
* * *
(2)
* * *
(c) A copy of the proclamation shall also be mailed to the secretary of state
who shall within twenty-four hours immediately after receipt of the information
notify all election officials having any duty to perform in connection with a special
election to fill such vacancy, including the parish board of election supervisors.
When a special election is required, the appointee shall serve only until the successor
is elected and takes office.
§621. Vacancy in office of judge
* * *
B. Immediately after issuance of the proclamation, the secretary of state shall
publish the proclamation in the official journal of each parish in which the election
is to be held. Within twenty-four hours after its issuance, the governor shall send a
copy of the proclamation to the secretary of state. Within twenty-four hours
Immediately after he receives the copy, the secretary of state shall notify all election
officials having any duty to perform in connection with a special election to fill such
vacancy, including the parish boards of election supervisors for the parish or parishes
in which the vacancy occurred.
* * *
Page 21 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
§1254. Slates of candidates not affiliated with a recognized political party;
nominating petitions and qualifying by payment of qualifying fees
* * *
C. Nominating petitions for the office of presidential elector shall be in the
form prescribed by R.S. 18:465(D), except that in lieu of including the recognized
political party with which the candidates are affiliated, the petition shall contain, in
not more than three words, the political principle which the candidates represent.
Also, in lieu of the date of the primary election for which the candidates seek to
qualify, the petition shall include the date of the general election. The Each sheet of
the petition also shall include the names of the candidate for president and the
candidate for vice president whom the candidates for elector support in lieu of the
candidate's name and domicile address; however, neither the candidate for president
nor the candidate for vice president supported by the slate of candidates for electors
shall be a candidate for that office supported by a recognized political party or by a
slate of candidates for elector who have previously filed a nominating petition or
qualified by the payment of a qualifying fee for that election. Each petition shall
contain a full slate of candidates for elector, one from each congressional district and
two from the state at large. In designating the office for which the candidate is
nominated, the petition shall designate the particular office of presidential elector,
that is, the district in which the candidate is a qualified elector if he is nominated for
the office for that district, or the designation "At large" in the case of the two offices
to be filled at large. Each nominating petition shall be accompanied by the notice
of candidacy and notarized affidavit of each candidate for elector signifying that the
certificate constitutes his acceptance of the nomination.
* * *
§1259. Arrangement of ballot; designation of party candidates
* * *
B.
* * *
Page 22 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
(2) Directly to the left of In addition to the names of the presidential and vice
presidential candidates, the following shall appear:
* * *
§1300.2. Petition for recall election; campaign finance disclosure
* * *
C.(1) Prior to the entering of any signatures on a petition, the chairman
designated to represent the petitioners shall file with the secretary of state a copy of
the recall petition which will be used and copies of a picture identification that
contain the name and signature of the chairman and vice chairman, respectively, or
copies of current utility bills, bank statements, government checks, paychecks, or
other government documents that show the name and address of the chairman and
vice chairman, respectively. Upon receipt of the recall petition, the secretary of state
shall provide to the chairman and vice chairman, respectively, a document prepared
by the secretary of state in conjunction with the Louisiana Registrars of Voters
Association, subject to approval as to content by the attorney general, providing
general information on petition requirements and deadlines. Upon receipt of the
recall petition, the secretary of state shall endorse certify thereon the fact and the date
of filing, and this unsigned copy of the recall petition shall be a public record. A
copy shall be transmitted by the secretary of state to the registrar of voters for each
parish in which the recall election is to be held. The chairman shall list on the
petition every parish that is wholly or partially within the voting area where the
recall election is to be held. The petition shall be considered filed when it is received
in the office of the secretary of state. Upon receipt of the recall petition, the
secretary of state shall produce a report of the number of qualified electors in the
voting area wherein the recall election is sought effective on the date of receipt of the
recall petition and shall notify the registrar of voters in each parish in the voting area
of the number of qualified electors of the voting area in the parish for issuance of the
certification.
* * *
Page 23 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
§1300.3. Certification of registrar of voters; addition or withdrawal of signatures;
designation as a public record; form of names
A.(1)
* * *
(b) The registrar of voters for each parish in the voting area may request and
accept the assistance of employees of the Department of State and registrars and
deputy registrars of voters from other parishes to complete the certification of the
recall petition. Each person offering such assistance shall be considered a deputy
registrar of the requesting parish registrar for that purpose only.
* * *
§1303. Persons entitled to vote in compliance with this Chapter
* * *
K. Secretary of state and employees. The secretary of state or an employee
of the secretary of state Department of State who is a qualified voter and who
submits to the registrar of voters of the parish where he is registered to vote a letter
from his supervisor on Department of State letterhead confirming his employment,
a paystub, or a copy of a state employee identification card may vote absentee by
mail upon meeting the requirements of this Chapter.
L. Employees of the registrar. An employee of the registrar of voters who
is a qualified voter registered to vote in a parish other than his parish of employment
and who submits to the registrar of voters of the parish where he is registered to vote
a letter from his employing registrar of voters confirming his employment, a paystub,
or a copy of an identification card showing employment with the registrar of voters
may vote absentee by mail upon meeting the requirements of this Chapter.
* * *
§1309. Early voting; verification
* * *
D.
* * *
Page 24 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
(2) If the voter's name is found in the state voter registration computer
system on the inactive list of voters, the voter shall be required to complete an
address confirmation card form to determine his eligibility to vote.
* * *
K.(1) A person qualified voter who is able to perform the essential duties of
a commissioner may serve as an early voting commissioner only if he has received
a certificate of instruction as provided in R.S. 18:431(A) and has attended a course
of instruction for early voting commissioners and received a certificate of instruction
from the registrar of voters.
(2) An early voting commissioner shall meet the same qualifications of a
commissioner as provided in R.S. 18:425(B). A person to whom one or more of the
following applies shall not serve as an early voting commissioner:
(a) The person is a candidate in the election.
(b) An immediate family member of the person is a candidate for election
to public office in the election.
(c) The person is marked for assistance in voting in the precinct register or
requires the use of the audio ballot in voting.
(d) The person has been convicted of an election offense enumerated in
Chapter 10 of this Title.
(e) The person is required to register as a sex offender or child predator
pursuant to R.S. 15:542.
* * *
N.
* * *
(5) A list of early voting watchers shall be filed with the registrar of voters
by hand delivery, facsimile, mail, or commercial courier before 4:30 p.m. on the
fourteenth tenth business day before the first day of early voting for the party
primary, primary, or general election; however, if the fourteenth tenth business day
before the first day of early voting for the party primary, primary, or general election
falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or other legal holiday, the list shall be filed on the next
Page 25 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
day which is not a Saturday, Sunday, or other legal holiday. For purposes of this
Paragraph, "commercial courier" shall have the same meaning as provided in R.S.
13:3204(D).
* * *
§1309.3. Assistance in voting during early voting
* * *
B. Persons prohibited from assisting voters during early voting.
* * *
(4)
* * *
(b) The voter, along with the person assisting the voter, shall complete a
voter assistance form and provide the name of the person assisting the voter and
attest whether the person, other than a commissioner, providing assistance was paid
to assist the voter. If the voter is not marked for assistance in voting in the statewide
voter registration database, the voter shall attest on the voter assistance form that the
voter has a physical disability or is unable to read and requires assistance in voting.
* * *
§1310. Execution of certificate; marking of ballot; casting vote; assistance
A.
* * *
(3) In order to cast a vote on an absentee by mail ballot, a voter shall make
a selection for a candidate or for or against a proposition by completely filling in the
oval to the right of a selection and returning the ballot to the registrar of voters as
provided in this Section within the applicable deadline set forth by law. If a voter
makes selections for more than the number of candidates to be elected for an office
or makes selections for and against the same proposition, the selections for that
office or proposition shall be void.
* * *
Page 26 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
§1313. Tabulation and counting of absentee by mail and early voting ballots
* * *
C.(1) Absentee by mail and early voting ballots shall be counted at a public
facility within the parish designated by the registrar of voters at a time fixed by the
parish board of election supervisors, which time shall be on election day no later than
8:00 p.m. If the time selected by the parish board of election supervisors to count
absentee by mail and early voting ballots is after 4:00 p.m. on election day, the
starttime shall be submitted to the commissioner of elections for approval no later
than the fourth day prior to election day.
* * *
H. The procedure for counting early voting machine ballots and paper ballots
voted during early voting shall be as follows:
* * *
(3) The board shall post the results from each early voting machine results
report for the early voting ballots, unless an early voting machine ballot has been
challenged pursuant to R.S. 18:1309(E)(6) or 1315.
* * *
(5) The board shall determine the validity of challenges to early voters who
cast a paper ballot made in accordance with R.S. 18:1315.
* * *
§1313.1. Preparation, verification, tabulation, and counting of absentee by mail and
early voting ballots
* * *
C.
* * *
(2) Absentee by mail and early voting ballots shall be counted at a public
facility within the parish designated by the registrar of voters at a time fixed by the
parish board of election supervisors, which time shall be on election day no later than
8:00 p.m. If the time selected by the parish board of election supervisors to count
absentee by mail and early voting ballots is after 4:00 p.m. on election day, the start
Page 27 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
time shall be submitted to the commissioner of elections for approval no later than
the fourth day prior to election day.
* * *
I. The procedure for counting early voting machine ballots on election day
shall be as follows:
* * *
(2) The board shall post the results from each early voting machine results
report for the early voting ballots, unless an early voting ballot has been challenged
pursuant to R.S. 18:1309(E)(6) or 1315.
* * *
§1314. Parish board commissioners
* * *
B. Selection for primary election.
* * *
(2) The parish board of election supervisors shall meet at 10:00 a.m. on the
fifth day before a primary election and shall select the parish board commissioners
and alternate parish board commissioners for the parish in the manner provided by
law for the selection of commissioners and alternate commissioners. If there are not
enough certified commissioners to select the appropriate number of parish board
commissioners and alternate parish board commissioners, the board of election
supervisors may select a qualified elector of the parish to serve; however, no such
elector shall serve as a parish board commissioner if a certified commissioner has
been selected as an alternate parish board commissioner.
* * *
C. Selection for general election.
* * *
(2)(a) If the parish board determines that the number of parish board
commissioners can be reduced, it shall notify each person who served as a parish
board commissioner or alternate parish board commissioner in the primary election
of its decision to reduce the number of parish board commissioners and of the date
Page 28 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
and time of the meeting to select the parish board commissioners for the general
election. The parish board shall meet at 10:00 a.m. on the fifth day before a general
election and shall select the parish board commissioners and alternate parish board
commissioners to serve in the general election for the parish.
* * *
(3) If the parish board and the secretary of state or his designee determine
that the number of parish board commissioners should be increased, the parish board
shall meet at 10:00 a.m. on the fifth day before a general election and shall select the
additional parish board commissioners and alternate parish board commissioners to
serve in the general election for that parish from the list of certified commissioners
who have not been chosen to serve in the general election as a
commissioner-in-charge, commissioner, or, if applicable, parish board commissioner
in the manner provided by law for the selection of commissioners and alternate
commissioners. If there are not enough certified commissioners to select the
appropriate number of parish board commissioners and alternate parish board
commissioners, the board of election supervisors may select a qualified elector of the
parish to serve; however, no such elector shall serve as a parish board commissioner
if a certified commissioner has been selected as an alternate parish board
commissioner.
* * *
§1315. Challenge of absentee by mail or early voting ballot
A.(1)(a) A candidate or his representative, a member of the board, or a
qualified elector may challenge an absentee by mail or early voting ballot for the
grounds specified in R.S. 18:565(A), by personally filing his written challenge with
the registrar no later than the fourth day before the election for which the ballot is
challenged. Such challenge shall be on a form provided by the secretary of state.
(b) A candidate or his representative, a member of the board, an early voting
watcher, or a qualified elector may challenge a person applying to early vote on the
grounds specified in R.S. 18:565(A), prior to the person casting an early voting
ballot. The challenged early voter shall not cast his ballot on an early voting
Page 29 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
machine, but shall be provided a paper ballot in accordance with R.S.
18:1309(E)(5)(b).
(2) A challenge made pursuant to this Subsection shall be on a form provided
by the secretary of state which The form shall include:
* * *
B. During the preparation and verification process for the counting of
absentee by mail and early voting ballots before the election, as applicable, or the
counting of absentee by mail and early voting ballots on election day, any candidate
or his representative, member of the board, or qualified elector may challenge an
absentee by mail or early voting paper ballot for cause, other than those grounds
specified in R.S. 18:565(A). Failure to include a witness's printed name or mailing
address on an absentee ballot certificate shall not be grounds to challenge an
absentee by mail ballot.
* * *
D.
* * *
(2) If a challenge in accordance with the provisions of Subsection A of this
Section is sustained, the vote shall not be counted; the ballot or early voting
confirmation sheet shall be placed in the special, secure absentee by mail and early
voting ballot container; and the board shall notify the voter in writing of the
challenge and the cause therefor. This notification shall be on a form provided by
the secretary of state and shall be signed by at least a majority of the members of the
board. The notice of the challenge and the cause therefor shall be given within four
business days by mail, addressed to the voter at his place of residence. The board
shall retain a copy of the notification. However, if the challenge is based upon a
change of residence within the parish or is based upon a change of residence outside
of the parish that has occurred within the last three months, the ballot shall be
counted, provided that the voter confirmed his current address as shown by the
affidavit of the absentee by mail ballot certificate or early voting confirmation sheet
Page 30 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
or, if the voter is on the inactive list of voters, as shown by the information provided
on an address confirmation notice form.
* * *
§1316. Rejection of ballot having distinguishing marks
* * *
D. The secretary of state may promulgate rules in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act necessary to effectuate the provisions and purposes
of this Section.
§1317. Curing absentee by mail ballot deficiencies; rejection of deficient ballots
A.(1) The secretary of state shall promulgate and adopt rules in accordance
with the Administrative Procedure Act as necessary to effectuate uniform and
standardized processes for the review and curing or rejection of deficient absentee
by mail ballots by the parish board of election supervisors,.
(2) The failure of a witness to provide his printed name or address on the
absentee by mail certificate shall not be deemed a deficiency requiring cure.
B. The secretary of state shall maintain records of all ballots rejected
pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 18:1315(D)(3)(a), and shall include information
detailing the total number of ballots rejected per parish and the reasons for their
rejection in the post-election statistical data published to the website of the secretary
of state.
* * *
§1333. Nursing home early voting program; voting by persons residing in a nursing
home
* * *
B. A qualified voter who resides in a nursing home within the parish in
which the voter is entitled to vote may vote early as provided in this Section during
the period extending at least two weeks prior to the beginning day for early voting
Page 31 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
through four days before election day the last day for early voting established by R.S.
18:1309.
* * *
G. The voting by each voter shall be accomplished in the following manner:
(1) The voter shall present to the registrar the letter the voter received from
the registrar that bears the reply number assigned as provided in Subsection E of this
Section. The registrar shall compare the number on the letter with the number on the
absentee by mail ballot envelope in his possession and, if they are identical, the
registrar shall hand the envelope containing the absentee by mail ballot to the voter.
However, if the voter is on the inactive list of voters, the voter shall complete an
address confirmation notice form prior to receiving the envelope containing the
absentee by mail ballot.
* * *
(7) Upon receipt of an address confirmation notice form, the registrar shall
reinstate the voter to the official list of voters.
* * *
§1367.2. Authority to resolve protested solicitations and awards
* * *
F. Stay of procurements during protests. In the event of a timely protest
under Subsection A of this Section, the state shall not proceed further with the
solicitation or with the awarding of the contract unless the chief procurement officer
makes a written determination that the awarding of the contract is necessary without
delay to protect the substantial interests of the state. Upon such determination by the
chief procurement officer, no court shall enjoin progress under the award except
after notice and hearing. Protest bond to stay procurement during protest. (1) A
protestant who timely protests a solicitation or an award may apply for a stay only
during the time period provided in Subsection A of this Section to protest a
solicitation or an award.
Page 32 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
(2) The protest bond and stay application shall be conducted in the manner
provided in R.S. 39:1671(F)(2) and (3).
* * *
§1367.11. Trial; Hearing; decision; appeal
A. Actions objecting to the solicitation or award of a contract pursuant to this
Subpart shall be tried heard summarily on the administrative record, without a jury,
and in open court. The trial hearing, which shall be confined to the administrative
record, shall begin no later than fourteen days after suit is filed.
* * *
§1371. Delivery and return of machines and supplies; contract; time of delivery
A.(1)(a) The secretary of state shall contract for the delivery to the voting
precincts of the election day machines and other election equipment and supplies for
which he is responsible and for their return to the storage warehouses. The
specifications for the contract shall be prepared by the secretary of state after
consultation with and approval by the parish custodian of the parish in which the
contract is to be performed. The contract shall be advertised and let procured in
accordance with the Louisiana Procurement Code. The governing authority of the
parish or municipality in which the voting machines are to be used may submit bids
and be awarded contracts for the drayage of the voting machines.
(b) The secretary of state may contract for delivery the week prior to the
beginning of early voting until no later than 11:59 p.m. on the day before early
voting begins for an election, in the parishes that have three or more early voting
locations, of the voting machines and other election equipment and supplies for
which he is responsible and for their return to the offices of the registrars of voters
or the location designated by the registrar of voters within twenty-four hours of the
end of early voting. The specifications for the contract shall be prepared by the
secretary of state after consultation with and approval by the registrar of voters of the
parish in which the contract is to be performed. The contract shall be advertised and
let procured in accordance with the Louisiana Procurement Code. The governing
authority of the parish or municipality in which the voting machines are to be used
Page 33 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
may submit bids and be awarded contracts for the drayage of the early voting
machines.
(2) If the secretary of state seeks to award a contract by competitive sealed
bidding, in In addition to all other notices and advertisements for bids required, the
secretary of state shall furnish notice of the invitation for bids at least thirty days
prior to the opening of bids for each contract for the delivery of machines to the early
voting locations or voting precincts for a parish in the following manner:
* * *
§1401. Objections to candidacy; contests of elections; contests of certification of
recall petition; parties authorized to institute actions; penalties
* * *
G. A qualified elector may bring an action objecting to the placement of a
constitutional amendment on a ballot.
H. Upon a determination that a candidate knowingly attested to false
information in a notice of candidacy, the court shall assess court costs and attorney
fees, and the court may impose any other sanctions the court deems appropriate
against the candidate.
§1402. Proper parties
* * *
B.(1) The following persons are the proper parties against whom election
contests shall be instituted:
(a) The secretary of state, in his official capacity, when contesting an
election on any proposed amendment to the constitution or when contesting the
placement of a constitutional amendment on a ballot.
* * *
§1405. Time for commencement of action
A. An action objecting to candidacy shall be instituted no earlier than the day
the candidate submits his notice of candidacy to the qualifying official and no not
later than 4:30 p.m. of the seventh day after the close of qualifications for candidates
in the primary election. After the expiration of the time period set forth in this
Page 34 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
Section, no further action shall be commenced objecting to candidacy based on the
grounds for objections to candidacy contained in R.S. 18:492.
B. An action contesting any election involving election to office shall be
instituted no earlier than the day after the date of the election and no not later than
4:30 p.m. of the ninth day after the date of the election, and no such contest shall be
declared moot because of the performance or nonperformance of a ministerial
function including but not limited to matters relating to the printing of ballots for the
general election.
C.(1) An action contesting an election on a proposed constitutional
amendment shall be instituted no earlier than the day after the election and not no
later than 4:30 p.m. of the tenth day after promulgation of the results of the election
by the secretary of state.
(2) An action objecting to the placement of a constitutional amendment on
a ballot shall be instituted no earlier than the date of the final passage of the joint
resolution calling the election and no later than 4:30 p.m. of the thirtieth day after
final passage of the legislative instrument calling the election.
D. An action contesting an election submitting a proposition to the voters,
except a constitutional amendment or a proposition covered by Subsection Paragraph
(C)(2) or Subsection E of this Section, shall be instituted no earlier than the day after
the date of the election and no not later than 4:30 p.m. of the thirtieth day after the
official promulgation of the results of the election.
E. An action contesting an election on a proposition submitted to the voters
relating to the issuance of bonds, refunding bonds, assuming an indebtedness, or
levying a tax shall be instituted no earlier than the day after the date of the election
and no not later than 4:30 p.m. of the sixtieth day after official promulgation of the
results. If the legality of the election, the bond issue provided for, the tax authorized,
or the assumption of indebtedness is not contested within the sixty days herein
prescribed, the authority to incur the debt, levy the tax, or issue the bonds, the
legality thereof, and the taxes and other revenues necessary to pay the same shall be
conclusively presumed to be valid and no court thereafter shall have authority to
inquire into such matters.
Page 35 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
F. An action contesting the certification of a recall petition shall be instituted
after the certification of the recall petition as provided in R.S. 18:1300.3 and not later
than 4:30 p.m. of the fifteenth day after the governor has issued the proclamation
ordering the recall election or not later than 4:30 p.m. of the fifteenth day after the
last day for the governor to call the election if no recall election is called.
G. Except as provided in Paragraph (C)(1) of this Section, an An action
objecting to the calling of a special election shall be instituted no earlier than the day
after the date the election is called and no not later than 4:30 p.m. of the fourteenth
day after the calling of the election date the election is called.
H. An action contesting any election involving the recall of a public officer
shall be instituted no earlier than the day after the date of the election and no not later
than 4:30 p.m. of the ninth day after the date of the election.
* * *
§1413. Computation of time
Computation of all time intervals in this Chapter shall include Sundays and
other legal holidays. However, if the time interval ends on a Sunday or other legal
holiday, then noon 4:30 p.m. of the next legal day shall be deemed to be the end of
the time interval.
* * *
§1922.2. Approval of reapportionment plan by local election officials
* * *
B.
* * *
(2) The registrar of voters and clerk of court shall review and confirm in
writing the ability to conduct an election utilizing the proposed plan.
(3) The local governing body shall submit to the secretary of state in
accordance with timetables in this Section, the written report received by the local
governing body.
Page 36 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
Section 2. R.S. 18:107(H) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§107. Party affiliation for registration; change in party affiliation
* * *
H. A person who is registered as or who applies for registration as
"unaffiliated" shall have his party affiliation changed to "no party".
Section 3. R.S. 18:154(C)(1)(h) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§154. Records open to inspection; copying; exceptions
* * *
C.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the contrary, the
registrar, the clerk of court, the Department of State, the office of motor vehicles of
the Department of Public Safety and Corrections and any entity that contracts with
the office, each voter registration agency and any entity that contracts with a voter
registration agency, and any person who handles the voter registration application
form of another person shall be prohibited from circulating on a commercial list or
otherwise disclosing the following:
* * *
(h) The voter registration application and any information contained on the
voter registration application of any person who is sixteen or seventeen years of age,
except that the voter registration information of a person who is seventeen years of
age may appear in a precinct register when that person will be eighteen years of age
within seven days before an election day.
* * *
Section 4. R.S. 18:402(G)(1) as amended and reenacted by Act No. 640 of the 2024
Regular Session of the Legislature shall supercede R.S. 18:402(G)(1) as amended and
reenacted by Act No. 386 of the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature.
Section 5. R.S. 18:2(9) and 154(F)(8) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§2. Definitions
As used in this Code, the following words and terms shall have the meanings
hereinafter ascribed to each, unless the context clearly indicates another meaning:
* * *
Page 37 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
(9) "Party primary office" means an office of senator or representative in the
United States Congress, justice of the supreme court, the State Board of Elementary
and Secondary Education, and the Public Service Commission.
* * *
§154. Records open to inspection; copying; exceptions
* * *
F. Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the contrary, the
registrar, the clerk of court, and the Department of State shall be prohibited from
disclosing the following:
* * *
(8) Votes that are void because of the death of a candidate pursuant to R.S.
18:469, withdrawal of a candidate pursuant to R.S. 18:502, resignation of a public
officer subject to a recall election pursuant to R.S. 18:1300.7, or disqualification of
a candidate pursuant to R.S. 18:1410, or cancellation of an election for an office or
proposition.
* * *
Section 6. R.S. 18:2(9) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2. Definitions
As used in this Code, the following words and terms shall have the meanings
hereinafter ascribed to each, unless the context clearly indicates another meaning:
* * *
(9) "Party primary office" means an office of senator or representative in the
United States Congress, justice of the supreme court, the State Board of Elementary
and Secondary Education, and the Public Service Commission.
* * *
Section 7.(A)(1) The May 16, 2026, and June 27, 2026, party primary elections for
representative in the United States Congress are hereby cancelled. Notwithstanding any
provision of the Louisiana Election Code to the contrary, votes cast in the May 16, 2026, or
June 27, 2026, party primary election for representative in the United States Congress shall
be void and not counted. No election official, as defined in R.S. 18:1466, shall disclose votes
Page 38 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
cast in the May 16, 2026, or June 27, 2026, party primary election for representative in the
United States Congress.
(2) The secretary of state shall remit to each candidate the state portion of the
qualifying fee, as provided for in R.S. 18:464(B)(1), and the additional qualifying fee, as
provided for in R.S. 18:464(B)(5), that the candidate paid to qualify for the May 16, 2026,
and June 27, 2026, party primary elections for representative in the United States Congress.
The secretary of state shall cancel any nominating petition received for the May 16, 2026,
and June 27, 2026, party primary elections for representative in the United States Congress.
(B) Candidates for representative in the United States Congress shall be elected at
the open primary election to be held on November 3, 2026, and the open general election to
be held on December 12, 2026.
(C)(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 18:467, the qualifying period for all
candidates in the 2026 fall primary election, including candidates for representative in the
United States Congress, shall begin on August 5, 2026. The qualifying period for such
candidates shall close at 4:30 p.m. on August 7, 2026.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 18:465(C)(3)(b), the number of qualified
voters who must timely sign a nominating petition for a candidate for representative in the
United States Congress for the 2026 congressional election shall be two hundred fifty.
Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 18:465(D), the nominating petition shall not be
required to set forth the congressional district for which a candidate for representative in the
United States Congress seeks to qualify until the petition is submitted to the registrar of
voters. A qualified voter may sign the nominating petition beginning on the effective date
of this Section. The nominating petition shall be submitted to the registrar of voters no later
than July 9, 2026.
Section 8.(A) Section 1 of this Act shall become effective August 1, 2026.
(B) Section 2 of this Act shall become effective September 1, 2026.
(C) Section 3 of this Act shall become effective February 1, 2027.
(D) Section 6 of this Act shall become effective January 1, 2027.
Page 39 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 842 ENROLLED
(E) Sections 4, 5, and 7 and this Section of this Act shall become effective upon
signature by the governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for
bills to become law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section
18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved
by the legislature, Sections 4, 5, and 7 and this Section of this Act shall become effective on
the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 40 of 40
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.